apertium-iii.iii.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sichuan Yi

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <cl>     # Classifier
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <cnjcoo>   # Conjunction
# <vaux>   # Auxiliary verb
# <part>   # Particle


# Productive alternations
# <dim>    # Diminutive
# <aug>    # Augmentative
# <qst>    # Question
# <nmlz_act>   # Action normalizer
# <nmlz_qlt>   # Quality normalizer
# <nmlz_mnr>   # Manner normalizer
# <adjz_easy>   # Easieness suffix
# <adjz_hard>   # Difficulty suffix
# <nmlz_act>   # Manner normalizer
# <qnty>   # Quantity Reduplication
# <int>   # Intensifictaion Reduplication
# <col>   # Color ideophones

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis



# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary


###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################


PATTERNS
## AdjStem Patterns
AdjStems [<adj>:]
:SizePrefixes AdjStems [<adj>:] SizePrefixes:
AdjStems [<adj>:] NegSuffixes
:AdjStems AdjStems [<adj><qst>:]
AdjStems [<adj>:] AdvlSuffixes


## VerbStem Patterns
VerbStems [<vblex>:]
VerbStems [<vblex>:] NmlzSuffixes
VerbStems [<vblex>:] AdjzSuffixes
VerbStems :Intensification :VerbStems Intensification:
VerbStems [<vblex>:] NegSuffixes

## NounStem Patterns
NounStems [<n>:]
:NounStems [:>{red}] NounStems [<n><qnty>:]

## Pronoun Patterns
Pronouns [<prn>:]
:Pronouns Pronouns [<prn><tn>:]

## QuoteStems Patterns
QuoteStems [<quote>:]

## Preposition PATTERNS
Preposition [<pr>:]

## Postposition PATTERNS
Postposition [<post>:]

## Classifier PATTERNS
Classifier [<cl>:]

## Particles PATTERNS-lex|rtx-proc iii-zho.rtx.bin -T
Particles [<part>:]

## Determiner PATTERNS
Determiner [<det>:]

## Conjunction PATTERNS
Conjunction [<cnjcoo>:]

## Adverb PATTERNS
Adverb [<adv>:]

Number
Punctuation

LEXICON SizePrefixes
<dim>:ix
<aug>:a
<aug>:ax


LEXICON NegSuffixes
<neg>:>{infx}ap>{L1}{L2}{L3}{L4}{L5}

LEXICON NmlzSuffixes
<nmlz_act>:lu
<nmlz_qly>:jjux
<nmlz_mnr>:tie
<nmlz_loc>:dde
<nmlz_pers>:su

LEXICON AdjzSuffixes
<adjz_easy>:sa
<adjz_hard>:we

LEXICON AdvlSuffixes
+mu<part>:mu
+muda<part>:muda

LEXICON Intensification
<v><int>:jjy




###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON AdjStems
sho:sho{X}
ssi:ssi{X}
zhut:zhut
du:du{X}
ly:ly ##consider tone change
ceqy:ceqy
nrat:nrat
nyi:nyi{X}
fu:fu{X}
nu:nu{X}
zyr:zyr{X}
guo:guo{X}
nzyt:nzyt
kepnyip:kepnyip
wezze:wezze
ahnat:ahnat
axnyi:axnyi
hxiekat:hxiekat
ahni:ahni
apnryr:apnryr
ngeget:ngeget
katgonyi:katgonyi
rropzie:rropzie
nzit:nzit
kepnyix:kepnyix
bap:bap

LEXICON VerbStems
sat:sat
mgu:mgu
hxip:hxip
ndo:ndo
ju:ju
bi:bi
zhe:zhe
gu:gu
hlu:hlu
budex:budex
syp:syp
hxep:hxep
yy:yy
vy:vy
sot:sot
mga:mga
hna:hna
nyi:nyi
ndup:ndup
zze:zze
yu:yu
dde:dde
su:su
bbo:bbo
jjie:jjie
shyp:shyp
go:go
mgot:mgot
ddie:ddie
la:la
lasix:lasix
rep:rep
ga:ga
gup:gup
wamgot:wamgot
shep:shep
jox:jox
burlopbur:burlopbur
bit:bit
mu:mu
depla:depla
repsix:repsix
ixgo:ixgo
bbossox:bbossox
mopddi:mopddi
hxiplox:hxiplox
zzi:zzi
bbyx:bbyx
nge:nge
jipndip:jipndip
bot:bot
shyr:shyr
jjo:jjo
apjjo:apjjo
tatxi:tatxi
ngopdie:ngopdie
ddopzyssi:ddopzyssi
pohxo:pohxo
sot:sot
sup:sup
ddieddur:ddieddur
qi:qi
sha:sha
bbur:bbur
gohxex:gohxex
ddur:ddur
kut:kut
hxipryt:hxipryt
jomga:jomga
lotbuop:lotbuop
yyx:yyx
gge:gge

LEXICON NounStems
muddix:muddix
mudi:mudi
muhly:muhly
lurmat:lurmat
ke:ke{X}
qi:qi{X}
lot:lot
jjie:jjie
yi:yi
co:co
lyp:lyp
nyitcy:nyitcy
nzyke:nzyke
lurkur:lurkur
co:co
ipko:ipko
ipkobbux:ipkobbux
xy:xy
yyr:yyr
yisu:yisu
loxggu:loxggu
lo:lo
vat:vat
bbo:bbo
hxenjit:hxenjit
qopbop:qopbop
te:te
ndip:ndip
kolo:kolo
bburma:bburma
sytmuco:sytmuco
bburmasytmuco:bburmasytmuco
hxie:hxie
ku:ku
zza:zza
hmatmop:hmatmop
lupo:lupo
latyy:latyy
syt:syt
rremop:rremop
sisse:sisse
ixyi:ixyi
vot:vot
va:va
jjossy:jjossy
vitgga:vitgga
rrezza:rrezza
jieshat:jieshat
nry:nry
cox:cox
mopsu:mopsu
bbapga:bbapga
bbutvit:bbutvit
yyx:yyx
saddop:saddopW
suxmu:suxmu
zyxsse:zyxsse
ggapmop:ggapmop
ddop:ddop
yophap:yophap
yotvi:yotvi
yoptiep:yoptiep
yypmop:yypmop
gopbo:gopbo
jjut:jjut
kex:kex
bu:bu
vatjji:vatjji
wevi:wevi
jeqyt:jeqyt
bbutvie:bbutvie
yo:yo
hxe:hxe
si:si
hxopu:hxopu

LEXICON Adverb
hxiyip:hxiyip
mu:mu
cy:cy
cyxluo:cyxluo
ngeget:ngeget
tat:tat
ryrggurwmu:ryrggurwmu
bur:bur
aplop:aplop
yipsy:yipsy
mieplie:mieplie
wa:wa
ipnyip:ipnyip
nyi:nyi

LEXICON QuoteStems
ddix:ddix


LEXICON Determiner
cyx:cyx


LEXICON Particles
ne:ne
li:li
njuo:njuo
xip:xip
tit:tit
ddit:ddit
ggex:ggex
shex:shex
sat:sat
ox:ox
mat:mat
lox:lox
ddeplox:ddeplox
su:su
cyx:cyx
jjy:jjy


LEXICON Preposition
ddix:ddix
sip:sip
bbyp:bbyp
die:die
ddie:ddie
shu:shu
jox:jox
ga:ga
gep:gep
da:da
go:go
six:six
sat:sat
njuo:njuo
jop:jop
nyipyuot:nyipyuot
rroxmu:rroxmu
nyi:nyi

## double check
hnox:hnox
wex:wex

LEXICON Postposition
qo:qo
chop:chop
mo:mo
mox:mox
xi:xi
sat:sat
da:da
goxsha:goxsha
six:six


LEXICON Pronouns
ngat:ngat
nga:nga
ngax:ngax
nop:nop
nit:nit
cy:cy
cyx:cyx
ngop:ngop
ngopwox:ngopwox
cop:cop
xix:xix
go:go
ne:ne
wox:wox
cypnyit:cypnyit
cyp:cyp
hotpu:hotpu
addit:addit
xymip:xymip
mugox:mugox
copwox:copwox
kaxddi:kaxddi

LEXICON Classifier
ma:ma
pot:pot
ji:ji
qit:qit
hmo:hmo
pit:pit
zi:zi
zzyr:zzyr
ggat:ggat
jot:jot
gu:gu
bbut:bbut
zha:zha
gur:gur
jjit:jjit
wo:wo
go:go
yuot:yuot
zhep:zhep

LEXICON Conjunction
sinip:sinip
lox:lox
tit:tit


PATTERN Number
Numeral+ [<num>:]
Numbers [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9

LEXICON Numbers

cyp:cyp
nyip:nyip
suo:suo
ly:ly
nge:nge
fut:fut
shyp:shyp
hxit:hxit
ggu:ggu
ci:ci


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
：<sent>:：
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/
。<sent>:。
。<sent>:。
；<sent>:；
！<sent>:！
，<cm>:，
、<sent>:、
？<sent>:？
# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
